Illinois, session 104th, HB4173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build 6Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for the purpose of a grant to the Chicago Park 8District for costs associated with the reconstruction of the 9field house at Ogden Park in the City of Chicago. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.